Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 5 Trustees and Trust Management

386A.5-010.
Management of statutory trust.

The business and affairs of a statutory trust must be managed by or under the authority of its trustees.

If there is at least one (1) trustee that in the discharge of all obligations under the governing instrument and this chapter is obligated to consider the interests of the trust and all series thereof, the governing instrument may provide that one (1) or more other trustees, in discharging their obligations, may consider only the interests of the trust or of one (1) or more series thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 33, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-020.
Trustee powers.

A trustee may exercise:

Powers conferred by the governing instrument;

Except as limited by the governing instrument, any other powers necessary or convenient to carry out the business and affairs of the statutory trust; and

Other powers conferred by this chapter.

Every trustee of a statutory trust, by acceptance of election or appointment as a trustee, including by service, shall be deemed thereby to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any action by the statutory trust or a beneficial owner against the trustee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 34, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-030.
Action by trustees.

On any matter that is to be acted on by trustees:

Each trustee has equal rights in the management and conduct of trust business; and

The trustees act by majority of the trustees.

The trustees may act other than at a meeting of the trustees if the minimum number of trustees necessary to authorize or to take action at a meeting consent in a signed record. Prompt notice of the action taken must be promptly communicated to all trustees.

A trustee may not vote by proxy.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 35, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-040.
Protection of person dealing with trustee.

A person that in good faith assists a trustee, or in good faith and for value deals with a trustee, without knowledge that the trustee is exceeding or improperly exercising the trustee’s power, is protected from liability as if the trustee properly exercised the power.

A person that in good faith deals with a trustee need not inquire into the extent of a trustee’s power or the propriety of the exercise of the power.

A person that in good faith delivers property to a trustee need not ensure its proper use.

A person that in good faith and without knowledge that the trusteeship has terminated assists a former trustee as if the former trustee were still a trustee, or in good faith and for value deals with a former trustee as if the former trustee were still a trustee, is protected from liability as if the former trustee were still a trustee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 36, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-050.
Trustee duties.

Subject to KRS

386A.5-010

(2), in exercising the powers of trusteeship, a trustee shall act in good faith, on an informed basis, and in a manner the trustee reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the statutory trust.

A trustee shall discharge his or her duties with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a similar position would reasonably believe appropriate under similar circumstances.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 37, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-060.
Good faith reliance.

A trustee, officer, employee, manager, committee of a statutory trust, or other person designated pursuant to KRS

386A.1-030

(4)(h) shall be entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more trustees, employees, or agents of the trust whom the person relying reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the person relying reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the trustees of which the relying person is not a member, if the relying person reasonably believes the committee to be reliable and competent in the matters presented.

No person shall be considered to be acting reasonably if he or she has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (1) of this section unwarranted.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 38, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-070.
Interested transactions.

Each trustee and each person designated pursuant to KRS

386A.1-030

(4)(h) owes a duty of loyalty to the statutory trust and any series thereof, including but not limited to the following:

To account to the trust or a series thereof and hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived in the conduct and winding up of the trust’s or series’s business or derived from a use of property, including the appropriation of an opportunity, of the trust or a series thereof;

To refrain from dealing with the trust in the conduct or winding up of the trust’s business as or on behalf of a party having an interest adverse to the trust; and

To refrain from competing with the trust or with any series thereof in the conduct of its business before dissolution.

A person subject to subsection (1) of this section who acts through a related party shall be treated as having acted directly.

That a transaction was fair to the statutory trust or a series thereof shall not constitute a defense to the breach of the obligation in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 39, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-080.
Trustee’s right to information.

A trustee has the right to receive from a statutory trust or another trustee information relating to the affairs of the trust which is reasonably related to the trustee’s discharge of the trustee’s duties as trustee. The trustee may enforce this right to information by summary proceeding in the appropriate court.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 40, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-090.
Indemnification and advancement.

Subject to KRS

386A.1-040

(2)(q), a statutory trust may:

Indemnify and hold harmless a trustee, beneficial owner, or other person with respect to any claim or demand against the person by reason of the person’s relationship with the trust; and

Advance expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, incurred by a trustee, beneficial owner, or other person in connection with a claim or demand against the person by reason of the person’s relationship to a trust before the final disposition of the claim or demand, upon an undertaking by or on behalf of the person to repay the trust if the person is ultimately determined not to be entitled to be indemnified under subsection (1) of this section. The terms of the undertaking shall be as set forth in the governing instrument or as approved by the disinterested trustees and shall be in a record.

The decision to indemnify or advance expenses shall be made by a committee of at least two (2) trustees not at that time parties to the proceeding or by the beneficial owners, but beneficial interests owned by or voted under the control of a trustee who are at the time parties to the proceeding shall not be voted on the determination.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 41, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-100.
Direction of trustees.

The governing instrument may authorize any person, including a beneficial owner, to direct a trustee or other person in the management of a statutory trust.

If the governing instrument confers on a person a power to direct actions by a trustee or other person, the trustee or other person shall act in accordance with a direction given, unless the direction is contrary to the terms of the governing instrument or the trustee or other person knows or has reason to know that following the direction would constitute a breach of fiduciary duty.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 42, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-110.
Delegation by trustee.

A trustee may delegate duties and powers, including to a co-trustee. The trustee shall exercise the care that a person in a similar position would reasonably believe appropriate under similar circumstances in:

Selecting an agent;

Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation; and

Periodically reviewing the agent’s actions in order to monitor the agent’s performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent of a trustee owes a duty to the statutory trust to comply with the terms of the delegation and to act with the care, competence, and diligence normally exercised by agents in similar circumstances.

A trustee that delegates duties and powers as provided in subsection (1) of this section is responsible to the statutory trust and the beneficial owners for the conduct of the agent in the performance of all delegated duties and powers.

An agent of a trustee submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this Commonwealth by accepting a delegation of powers or duties from a trustee with respect to a claim related to the agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 43, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.5-120.
Independent trustee in registered investment company.

In this section, “affiliated person” and “interested person” have the meanings set forth in the Investment Company Act of 1940, Pub. L. No. 76-768, as amended, or any successor statute and any regulations issued thereunder.

If a statutory trust is registered as an investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940, Pub. L. No. 76-768, as amended, or any successor statute and any regulations issued thereunder, a trustee is an independent trustee for all purposes under this chapter if the trustee is not an interested person of the trust. The receipt of compensation does not affect the status of the trustee as an independent trustee under this section if it is for:

Service as an independent trustee of the trust; or

Service as an independent trustee of one (1) or more other investment companies managed by a single investment adviser or an affiliated person of an investment adviser.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 44, effective July 12, 2012.